Arkansas, session 2025, HB1017.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-17-122 is amended to read as follows:
6-17-122. Paid maternity leave — Definitions.
(a)(1) Education personnel employed by An employee of a public school
district or an open-enrollment public charter school that elect to
participate under this section shall be eligible for up to twelve (12) weeks
of paid maternity leave when the employee:
(A) Has been employed by a public school district or an open-
enrollment public charter school for one (1) year or more;
(B) Is female, and the leave is to be used for maternity
purposes following the:
*TNL026*
03-31-2025 12:22:16 TNL026

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 H1/23/25 H3/31/25 HB1017
(i) Birth of the employee's biological child;
(ii) Placement of an adopted child under one (1) year of
age in the home of the employee; or
(iii) Foster placement of an infant under one (1) year of
age; and
(C) Has not been disciplined for any leave abuse during the past
year from the time of application.
(2) An employee shall not be eligible for an additional twelve
(12) weeks of paid maternity leave under this section following the adoption
of a child if the employee took twelve (12) weeks of paid maternity leave
under this section after the initial foster placement of the same child in
the employee's home.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) “Cost-sharing” means joint, equal responsibility for the
cost shared between the State of Arkansas and a public school district or
open-enrollment public charter school that employs an individual considered
education personnel under this section;
(2)(1) “Education personnel” "Employee" means an individual
employed full-time by a public school district or an open-enrollment public
charter school in Arkansas for more than one (1) year; and
(3)(2) “Maternity leave” means partially or fully compensated
time away from work within the first twelve (12) weeks following the:
(A) Birth of a biological child to an individual
considered education personnel under this section employee; or
(B) Placement of an adoptive adopted child under one (1)
year of age in the home of an individual considered education personnel under
this section employee; or
(C) Foster placement of an infant under one (1) year of
age in the home of an employee.
(c)(1) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall create
and sign a standard cost-sharing agreement for paid maternity leave expenses
between paid by the division and to a public school district or an open-
enrollment public charter school that elects to participate under this
section.
(2) At a minimum, the cost-sharing The agreement required under
subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall obligate the state and the public
03-31-2025 12:22:16 TNL026

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 H1/23/25 H3/31/25 HB1017
school district or open-enrollment public charter school to each pay fifty
percent (50%) division to pay one hundred percent (100%) of incurred costs
for approved paid maternity leave.
(3) The division shall promulgate rules outlining:
(A) Management of a cost-sharing the agreement required
under subdivision (c)(1) of this section;
(B) Reimbursement processes; and
(C) Other related procedures required to implement this
section.

/s/A. Collins

























03-31-2025 12:22:16 TNL026